District of Columbia statutes.
7-857.03

Health benefit plan reimbursement.

All health insurer health benefit plans shall reimburse for screenings conducted under this chapter.

History

Sept. 17, 2015, D.C. Law 21-20, § 4, 62 DCR 8845